District of Columbia statutes.
2-1506

Transfer of positions and funds.

(a)

The following positions and their associated funding are hereby transferred from the Office of Youth Opportunity Services to the Department of Manpower:

One deputy director GS-15
One manpower specialist GS-14
One computer systems analyst GS-13
One program analyst officer GS-12
One research assistant GS-9
One research assistant GS-7
Three clerks GS-4
The following positions and their associated funding, initially transferred in the Budget Act of 1977 to the Department of Manpower, are hereby transferred from the Office of Youth Opportunity Services to the Department of Recreation for the support of neighborhood planning council programs:
One recreation specialist GS-14
One program analyst officer GS-12
One social science analyst GS-11
Two field technical assistants GS-9
One secretary GS-6
One clerk GS-4
The funds available to the Office of Youth Advocacy, Department of Manpower, Department of Recreation, Federal City College, and District of Columbia Public Schools to carry out the purposes of this subchapter will be as delineated in the Budget Act of 1977, Act 1-94 (March 9, 1976) except as altered in subsections (a) and (b) of this section.
All positions and personnel so transferred shall continue to be governed by personnel legislation enacted by Congress, and rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, until such time as the District of Columbia government personnel system is established in accordance with § 1-204.22(3). Such positions and personnel may be reclassified or found in excess and separated from the service in accordance with this subchapter or an administrative order of the directors or president of the aforementioned agencies and departments.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-93, § 7, 23 DCR 9532b
Apr. 28, 1978, D.C. Law 2-75, § 2, 24 DCR 7498

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2606.
1973 Ed., § 6-2006.

References in Text

Pursuant to Mayor’s Order 2000-20, the agency formerly known as the “Department of Recreation” renamed the “Department of Recreation and Parks” shall be known as the “Department of Parks and Recreation.”

Editor's Notes

“Federal City College”, referred to in (c), has been merged into the University of the District of Columbia.